Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3620
Disputes; interstate commission; duties; rules.

(a) The interstate commission shall attempt, upon the request of a member state, to resolve disputes which are subject to the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact and which may arise among member states or member boards.

(b) The interstate commission shall promulgate rules providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution as appropriate.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 20.